Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-915.01
Inmate Welfare and Club Accounts Fund; created; use; investment.

The Inmate Welfare and Club Accounts Fund is created. The fund shall consist of revenue from soft drinks sold to inmates in the custody of the Department of Correctional Services, including proceeds from recycling cans or other containers containing such soft drinks, profit from departmental canteens, interest earned by the fund, interest on inmate trust funds pursuant to section 83-915, or other revenue at the department's discretion. The fund shall be used to provide recreational activities and equipment for inmates at all of the department's correctional facilities. The fund shall be administered by the Director of Correctional Services or his or her designee. Transfers may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Inmate Welfare and Club Accounts Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2002, LB 604, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB605, § 107;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 213.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.